Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.070

Registration—Claim of exemption filing—Duration—Renewal—Supplemental report.

(1) A franchise offering shall be deemed duly registered, and a claim of exemption under RCW 19.100.030(4)(b)(i) shall be duly filed, for a period of one year from the effective date of registration or filing unless the director by rule or order specifies a different period.

(2) Registration of a franchise offer may be renewed for additional periods of one year each, unless the director by rule or order specifies a different period, by filing with the director no later than twenty calendar days prior to the expiration thereof a renewal application containing such information as the director may require to indicate any substantial changes in the information contained in the original application or the previous renewal application and payment of the prescribed fee.

(3) If a material adverse change in the condition of the franchisor or the subfranchisor or any material change in the information contained in its disclosure document should occur the franchisor or subfranchisor shall so amend the registration on file with the director as soon as reasonably possible and in any case, before the further sale of any franchise.

[ 2012 c 121 s 5; 1991 c 226 s 5; 1972 ex.s. c 116 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 7.]